District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.05

Auditing.

Pursuant to provisions of IRP, the Mayor shall adopt audit procedures to review the uniform mileage schedules and fleet records of apportioned operators declaring the District of Columbia as their base jurisdiction. The audit procedures shall involve at least 15% of the IRP apportioned vehicles declaring the District of Columbia as their base jurisdiction base over a 5-year period. The 5-year period will commence October 1, 1997.

History

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 6, 44 DCR 3620

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-125.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 50-1507.01.